Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1354.04
Temporary Employee Pool Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Temporary Employee Pool Revolving Fund. The fund shall be administered by the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services. The fund shall consist of fees paid for services provided to state agencies by the division in providing temporary employees. The fund shall be used to pay for expenses incurred by the division in providing temporary employees.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 124.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.